test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-maa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - maa: # Noun 'land'
     maa+N+Sg+Nom: maa
     maa+N+Sg+Gen: maan
     maa+N+Sg+Acc: maan
     maa+N+Sg+Part: maata
     maa+N+Sg+Ill: maaha
     maa+N+Sg+Ine: maas
     maa+N+Sg+Ela: maast
     maa+N+Sg+All: maalle
     maa+N+Sg+Ade: maal
     maa+N+Sg+Abl: maalt
     maa+N+Sg+Tra: maaks
     maa+N+Sg+Ess: [maanna, maan]
     maa+N+Sg+Exe: maant


     maa+N+Pl+Nom: maat
     maa+N+Pl+Gen: maijen
     maa+N+Pl+Acc: maat
     maa+N+Pl+Part: maita
     maa+N+Pl+Ill: maihe
     maa+N+Pl+Ine: mais
     maa+N+Pl+Ela: maist
     maa+N+Pl+All: maille
     maa+N+Pl+Ade: mail
     maa+N+Pl+Abl: mailt
     maa+N+Pl+Tra: maiks
     maa+N+Pl+Ess: [mainna, main]
     maa+N+Pl+Exe: maint
